Hawaii statutes.
§26-8 Department of budget and finance.
(a) The department of budget and finance shall be headed by a single executive
to be known as the director of finance.

(b) The department shall:

(1) Undertake the preparation and execution of the
executive budget of the state government;

(2) Conduct a systematic and continuous review of the
finances, organization, and methods of each department of the State to assist
each department in achieving the most effective expenditure of all public funds
and to determine that such expenditures are in accordance with the budget laws
and controls in force;

(3) Have custody of state funds and be responsible
for the safekeeping, management, investment, and disbursement thereof; and

(4) Administer state debts.

(c) The functions and authority heretofore
exercised by the bureau of the budget (except for insurance management, surplus
property management, and central purchasing transferred to the department of
accounting and general services) and the funds custody, cash management, debt
management, and administering of veterans loan functions of the treasurer as
heretofore constituted are transferred to the department of budget and finance
established by this chapter.

(d) The employees' retirement system as
constituted by chapter 88 is placed within the department of budget and finance
for administrative purposes. The functions, duties, and powers, subject to the
administrative control of the director of finance, and the composition of the
board of trustees of the employees' retirement system shall be as heretofore
provided by law. [L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §14; am L 1963, c 114, §2; Supp, §14A-13;
HRS §26-8; am L 1971, c 107, §4; am L 1976, c 165, §7; am L Sp 1988, c 1, §4;
am L 1989, c 26, §1; am L 1992, c 308, §3; am L 1995, c 126, §2; am L 1997, c
350, §3; am L 2014, c 108, §2]

Note

Distribution of cigarette tax revenues study; findings and
recommendations to legislature and governor by November 1, 2016. L 2016, c 88.

Pilot project for efficiency measures to be included with
budget documents submitted to the legislature; report to 2017 legislature;
auditor report (no later than March 1, 2017). L 2015, c 67.

Case Notes

Budget expenditures of the department of education,
discussed. 70 H. 253, 768 P.2d 1279.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next